District of Columbia statutes.
4-217.07

Condition of eligibility — Social Security number; assignment of support rights.

As a condition of eligibility, each applicant for or recipient of aid, including each child under the TANF or foster care programs operated pursuant to part A of title IV of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq.) shall be required to:

(1)

Furnish to the Mayor a Social Security account number, or to apply for a Social Security number if such a number has not been issued or is not known; and

(2)

Assign to the District of Columbia support rights, consistent with § 4-205.19(b) and (c).

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1707, 29 DCR 1060
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(xxx), 46 DCR 905
This section is referenced in § 4-217.08.
1981 Ed., § 3-217.7.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(x) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-7, August 1, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 4639).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(x) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(xxx) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(x) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-25, February 27, 1997, 44 DCR 1778), and § 2(x) of the Public Assistance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-77, May 27, 1997, 44 DCR 3181).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(x) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-306, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1900).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(xxx) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(xxx) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682),§ 2(xxx) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(xxx) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).